Maine, session 132, LD2091.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for the continuance of training for emergency medical
services technicians and paramedics.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,000,000